Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB65.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4602 and 4603(a) and (b) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 4602. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Court." A court of common pleas and the Philadelphia Municipal Court."Department." The Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services of the Commonwealth.§ 4603. Relatives' liability; procedure.(a) Liability.--123456789101112131415161718 (1) [Except as set forth in paragraph (2), all] All of the following individuals have the responsibility to care for and maintain or financially assist an indigent person, regardless of whether the indigent person is a public charge:(i) The spouse of the indigent person.(ii) A child of the indigent person.(iii) A parent of the indigent person.(2) Paragraph (1) [does not apply in any of] shall only apply in the following cases:[(i) If an individual does not have sufficient financial ability to support the indigent person.(ii) A child shall not be liable for the support of a parent who abandoned the child and persisted in the abandonment for a period of ten years during the child's minority.](i.1) In the case of an indigent individual who has applied for or is receiving medical assistance for long-term services and supports, including nursing facility and home and community-based services, when an individual under paragraph (1) has received or transferred any of the following owned by an indigent individual or spouse of an indigent individual for less than fair market value within five years of the date the indigent individual applies for or receives long-term services and supports:(A) An asset.(B) A resource, as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 178.2 (relating to definitions).(C) Income.(D) Real or personal property.(i.2) In the case of an indigent individual who has 20250HB0065PN0028 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applied for or is receiving medical assistance for long-term services and supports, including nursing facility and home and community-based services, when an individual under paragraph (1) does not cooperate with the department, a nursing facility, a provider or other person in the medical assistance eligibility process for an indigent individual.(3) Paragraph (1) does not apply to an individual who has received or transferred an asset, resource, income or real property or personal property under 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(C) (relating to liens, adjustments and recoveries, and transfers of assets) or 55 Pa. Code § 178.104(e)(3) (relating to disposition of assets and fair consideration provisions for transfers on or after July 30, 1994).(b) Amount.--(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), the amount of liability shall be set by the court in the judicial district in which the indigent person resides.(2) For medical assistance for [the aged other than public nursing home care,] long-term services and supports, including nursing home facility and home and community-based services, as provided in section 401 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the [Public Welfare] Human Services Code, the following apply:(i) Except as set forth in subparagraph (ii), the amount of liability shall, during any 12-month period, be the lesser of:(A) six times the excess of the liable individual's average monthly income over the amount required for the reasonable support of the liable 20250HB0065PN0028 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual and other persons dependent upon the liable individual; or(B) the cost of the medical assistance for [the aged.] long-term services and supports, including nursing home facility and home and community-based services.(ii) The department may, by reasonable regulations, adjust the liability under subparagraph (i), including complete elimination of the liability, at a cost to the Commonwealth not exceeding those funds certified by the Secretary of the Budget as available for this purpose.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0065PN0028 - 4 - 12345678910111213